Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1816
Committee or hearing officer; order; considerations; suspend proceedings; when.

(1) In determining whether to make an order under the Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Act, the committee or hearing officer shall consider all circumstances determined to be relevant, including, but not limited to, provocation, consent, or any other behavior of the victim which directly or indirectly contributed to his or her injury or death.

(2) An order may be made under the Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Act whether or not any person is prosecuted for or convicted of an offense arising out of the act which caused the injury or death involved in the application. Upon application made by an appropriate prosecuting authority, the committee may suspend proceedings under the Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Act for such period as it considers appropriate on the ground that a prosecution for an offense arising out of the act which caused the injury or death involved in the application has been commenced or is imminent.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 16;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 17;

Laws 1990, LB 87, § 6.

Social Security payment to aid dependent children who lost support of their mother not treated as form of collateral compensation when the board considers all relevant circumstances. Lambert v. Nebraska Cr. Vict. Rep. Bd., 214 Neb. 817, 336 N.W.2d 320 (1983).